North Carolina, session 2025, SB486.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Aging, the sum of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in
recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide support for the North
Carolina Senior Tar Heel Legislature.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S486-v-1*